Wisconsin, session 2025, SB38.
do enact as follows:SB38,1Section 1. 341.145 (3) of the statutes is amended to read:341.145 (3) In addition to the regular application fee provided under s. 341.25 (1) (a), (c) or (j) or (2) or 341.26 (3) (a) 2. or (am), the applicant for a personalized registration plate issued on an annual basis shall pay a fee of $15 for the issuance of the plate and $15 in each succeeding year to maintain the plate. In addition to the regular application fee provided under s. 341.25 (1) (b) or 341.26 (3) (a) 1., the applicant for a personalized registration plate issued on a biennial basis shall pay a fee of $30 for issuance of the plate if the plate is issued during the first year of the biennial registration period or $15 for issuance of the plate if the plate is issued during the 2nd year of the biennial registration period. The fee to maintain a personalized plate issued on a biennial basis is $30. The fee for reissuance of a personalized plate shall be $15 for an annual registration and $30 for a biennial registration. An No fee may be charged to an applicant for personalized plates issued under sub. (1) (b) or (c) shall not be required to pay the fee (1g) (a) or (b) for initial issuance of the plates. No fee may be charged to a member of a special group specified under s. 341.14 (6r) (f) 19m. for maintenance or reissuance of plates issued under sub. (1g) (b) displaying the applicable symbol of the special group specified under s. 341.14 (6r) (f) 19m.SB38,2Section 2. Effective date.(1) This act takes effect on the first day of the 7th month beginning after publication. Down Down /2025/related/enrolled/sb38 true enrolledbills /2025/related/enrolled/sb38 enrolledbills/2025/REG/SB38 enrolledbills/2025/REG/SB38 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Enrolled Legislation»SB38: Text as Enrolled × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting